Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-210
Proprietor's liability; limitation.

The limitations of liability, provided for in sections 41-208 and 41-209, shall apply to all property brought upon the premises of the hotel, restaurant, apartment house, motel, or rooming house for forty-eight hours after the guest has ceased occupying the premises and paid his or her bill therefor, which shall terminate the relation of keeper and guest, except that the keeper or owner may continue to hold such property at the risk of the guest or owner of such property.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 10.